Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 5. Allocation of Disbursements During Administration of Trust.

§ 64.2-1024.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

1999, c. 975, § 55-277.25; 2012, c. 614; repealed by 2022, c. 354.

§ 64.2-1025.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

1999, c. 975, § 55-277.26; 2012, cc. 614, 718; repealed by 2022, c. 354.

§ 64.2-1026.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

1999, c. 975, § 55-277.27; 2012, c. 614; repealed by 2022, c. 354.

§ 64.2-1027.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

1999, c. 975, § 55-277.28; 2012, c. 614; repealed by 2022, c. 354.

§ 64.2-1028.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

1999, c. 975, § 55-277.29; 2009, c. 477; 2012, c. 614; repealed by 2022, c. 354.

§ 64.2-1029.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

1999, c. 975, § 55-277.30; 2012, c. 614; repealed by 2022, c. 354.